District of Columbia statutes.
47-340.36

Information reporting.

Within 3 days after the Chief Financial Officer’s receipt of the transcript of proceedings relating to the issuance of the bonds, the Chief Financial Officer shall transmit a copy of the transcript to the Secretary to the Council.

Oct. 22, 2008, D.C. Law 17-254, § 2(b), 55 DCR 9275

History